Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-109
Contempt; fines; collection.

Fines shall be collected by virtue of a similar warrant, directed to any proper officer of the county in which the offender has property, and executed in the same manner as executions for fines issued by courts of justice, and the proceeds shall be paid into the state treasury.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 11, p. 250;

R.S.1913, § 3750;

C.S.1922, § 3143;

C.S.1929, § 50-109;

R.S.1943, § 50-109.